Illinois, session 104th, HB2168.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Dual Credit Quality Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 27/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Dual 8Credit Quality Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-194, eff. 1-1-10.)